Florida, session 2026, SB498.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 10 11 Section 1.âSubsection (7) is added to section 336.045, 12 Florida Statutes, to read: 13 336.045âUniform minimum standards for design, construction, 14 and maintenance; advisory committees.â 15 (7)âNotwithstanding any law to the contrary, beginning 16 October 1, 2026, all design and construction plans for the 17 installation of a crosswalk in a school zone, or on any public 18 street, road, or highway with a posted speed limit exceeding 35 19 miles per hour, when located at any point other than at a 20 signalized intersection, shall include appropriate traffic 21 control devices that conform to either: 22 (a)âChapter 4J titled âPedestrian Hybrid Beaconsâ of the 23 most recent Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices and any 24 other applicable standards of the department; or 25 (b)âChapter 4L titled âRectangular Rapid Flashing Beacons,â 26 Chapter 4S titled âFlashing Beacons,â or Chapter 4U titled âIn 27 Roadway Warning Lightsâ of the most recent Manual on Uniform 28 Traffic Control Devices and any other applicable standards of 29 the department. In-Roadway Warning Lights shall be used in 30 conjunction with Rectangular Rapid Flashing Beacons or Flashing 31 Beacons to improve visibility of the crosswalk. 32 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.